Hawaii statutes.
§174-18 Approval of legislature,
appropriations. Funds for acquisition or construction of facilities for
each project, established by the board of land and natural resources under
sections 174-13 and 174-17, may be requested from the legislature, as an appropriation
to be repaid without interest to the general funds of the State by the board
from water tolls, acreage assessments, and other receipts of the board within
such period as may be specified in the act making the appropriation. [L 1961, c
166, pt of §3; Supp, §86-17; HRS §174-18; am L 1987, c 306, §11]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next